src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-bikshaaz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - bikšāz: # Noun 172 'eng /est püks/fin' - full paradigm
     bikšāz+N+Sg+Nom: bikšāz
     bikšāz+N+Sg+Gen: bikšõ
     bikšāz+N+Sg+Par: bikšāzt
     bikšāz+N+Sg+Dat: bikšõn
     bikšāz+N+Sg+Ins: bikšõks
     bikšāz+N+Sg+Ill: [bikšõz, bikšõ]
     bikšāz+N+Sg+Ela: bikšāst
     bikšõd+N+Pl+Nom: bikšõd
     bikšõd+N+Pl+Gen: bikšõd
     bikšõd+N+Pl+Par: bikšīdi
     bikšõd+N+Pl+Dat: bikšõdõn
     bikšõd+N+Pl+Ins: bikšõdõks
     bikšõd+N+Pl+Ill: bikšīz
     bikšõd+N+Pl+Ela: bikšīst
